Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1528.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 646A.689 is amended to read:
646A.689. (1) As used in ORS 646A.680 to 646A.697:
(a) “Drug” has the meaning given that term in ORS 689.005.
(b) “Health care facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 442.015.
(c) “Health care service contractor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 750.005.
(d)(A) “Manufacture” means:
(i) The production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion or processing of a drug,
either directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of natural origin or independently by
means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis; and
(ii) The packaging or repackaging of a drug or labeling or relabeling of a drug container.
(B) “Manufacture” does not include the preparation or compounding of a drug by an individual
for the individual’s own use or the preparation, compounding, packaging or labeling of a drug:
(i) By a health care practitioner incidental to administering or dispensing a drug in the course
of professional practice;
(ii) By a health care practitioner or at the practitioner’s authorization and supervision for the
purpose of or incidental to research, teaching or chemical analysis activities and not for sale;
(iii) By a health care service contractor for dispensing to a subscriber or delivery to a health
care facility or outpatient clinic owned or operated by the health care service contractor or an af-
filiate of the health care service contractor;
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 101

A-Eng. SB 1528
(iv) By a centralized repackaging operation for distribution to subscribers of health care service
contractors or to pharmacies, health care facilities or outpatient clinics operated by or affiliated
with a health care service contractor; or
(v) By a health care facility for dispensing to a patient or other person.
(e) “Manufacturer” means a person that manufactures a prescription drug that is sold in this
state.
(f) “New prescription drug” has the meaning prescribed by the Department of Consumer and
Business Services by rule.
(g) “Patient assistance program” means a program that a manufacturer offers to the general
public in which a consumer may reduce the consumer’s out-of-pocket costs for prescription drugs
by using coupons or discount cards, receiving copayment assistance or by other means.
(h) “Prescription drug” means a drug that must:
(A) Under federal law, be labeled “Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without pre-
scription” prior to being dispensed or delivered; or
(B) Under any applicable federal or state law or regulation, be dispensed only by prescription
or restricted to use only by health care practitioners.
(i) “Price” means the wholesale acquisition cost as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1395w-3a(c)(6)(B).
(2) No later than March 15 of each year, a manufacturer shall report the information described
in subsection (3) of this section to the department regarding each prescription drug for which:
(a) The price was $100 or more for a one-month supply or for a course of treatment lasting less
than one month; and
(b) There was a net increase of 10 percent or more in the price of the prescription drug de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection over the course of the previous calendar year.
(3) For each prescription drug described in subsection (2) of this section, a manufacturer shall
report to the department, in the form and manner prescribed by the department:
(a) The name and price of the prescription drug and the net increase, expressed as a percentage,
in the price of the drug over the course of the previous calendar year;
(b) The length of time the prescription drug has been on the market;
(c) The factors that contributed to the price increase;
(d) The name of any generic version of the prescription drug available on the market;
(e) The research and development costs associated with the prescription drug that were paid
using public funds;
(f) The direct costs incurred by the manufacturer:
(A) To manufacture the prescription drug;
(B) To market the prescription drug;
(C) To distribute the prescription drug; and
(D) For ongoing safety and effectiveness research associated with the prescription drug;
(g) The total sales revenue for the prescription drug during the previous calendar year;
(h) The manufacturer’s profit attributable to the prescription drug during the previous calendar
year;
(i) The introductory price of the prescription drug when it was approved for marketing by the
United States Food and Drug Administration and the net yearly increase, by calendar year, in the
price of the prescription drug during the previous five years;
(j) The 10 highest prices paid for the prescription drug during the previous calendar year in any
country other than the United States;
[2]

A-Eng. SB 1528
(k) Any other information that the manufacturer deems relevant to the price increase described
in subsection (2)(b) of this section; and
(L) The documentation necessary to support the information reported under this subsection.
(4) The department may use any prescription drug price information the department deems ap-
propriate to verify that manufacturers have properly reported price increases as required by sub-
sections (2) and (3) of this section.
(5) [A manufacturer shall accompany the report provided under subsection (2) of this section with
the following information about each patient assistance program offered by the manufacturer to con-
sumers residing in this state for the prescription drugs described in subsection (2) of this section] No
later than March 15 of each year, a manufacturer shall, in addition to the information re-
quired under subsection (2) of this section, report the following information about each pa-
tient assistance program offered or funded by the manufacturer that provided assistance to
consumers residing in this state during the previous calendar year:
(a) The number of consumers who participated in the program;
(b) The total value of the coupons, discounts, copayment assistance or other reduction in costs
provided to consumers in this state who participated in the program;
(c) For each drug, the number of refills that qualify for the program, if applicable;
(d) If the program expires after a specified period of time, the period of time that the program
is available to each consumer; and
(e) The eligibility criteria for the program and how eligibility is verified for accuracy.
(6) No later than 30 days after a manufacturer introduces a new prescription drug for sale in
the United States at a price that exceeds the threshold established by the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services for specialty drugs in the Medicare Part D program, the manufacturer shall notify
the department, in the form and manner prescribed by the department, of all the following informa-
tion:
(a) A description of the marketing used in the introduction of the new prescription drug;
(b) The methodology used to establish the price of the new prescription drug;
(c) Whether the United States Food and Drug Administration granted the new prescription drug
a breakthrough therapy designation or a priority review;
(d) If the new prescription drug was not developed by the manufacturer, the date of and the
price paid for acquisition of the new prescription drug by the manufacturer;
(e) The manufacturer’s estimate of the average number of patients who will be prescribed the
new prescription drug each month; and
(f) The research and development costs associated with the new prescription drug that were paid
using public funds.
(7)(a) After receiving the report or information described in subsection (2), (3), (5) or (6) of this
section, the department may make a written request to the manufacturer for supporting documen-
tation or additional information concerning the report. The department shall prescribe by rule the
periods:
(A) Following the receipt of the report or information during which the department may request
additional information; and
(B) Following a request by the department for additional information during which a manufac-
turer may respond to the request.
(b) The department may extend the period prescribed under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection,
as necessary, on a case-by-case basis.
[3]

A-Eng. SB 1528
(8) A manufacturer may be subject to a civil penalty, as provided in ORS 646A.692, for:
(a) Failing to submit timely reports or notices as required by this section;
(b) Failing to provide information required under this section;
(c) Failing to respond in a timely manner to a written request by the department for additional
information under subsection (7) of this section; or
(d) Providing inaccurate or incomplete information under this section.
(9) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, the department shall post to its website
all of the following information:
(a) A list of the prescription drugs reported under subsection (2) of this section and the man-
ufacturers of those prescription drugs;
(b) Information reported to the department under subsections (3) and (5) to (7) of this section;
and
(c) Written requests by the department for additional information under subsection (7) of this
section.
(10)(a) The department may not post to its website any information described in subsection (9)
of this section if:
(A) The information is conditionally exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.345 as a trade secret;
and
(B) The public interest does not require disclosure of the information.
(b) If the department withholds any information from public disclosure pursuant to this sub-
section, the department shall post to its website a report describing the nature of the information
and the department’s basis for withholding the information from disclosure.
(c) A person may petition the Attorney General, as provided in ORS 192.411, to review a deci-
sion by the department to withhold information pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(11) In accordance with ORS 646A.694, the department shall provide to the Prescription Drug
Affordability Board established in ORS 646A.693:
(a) Each calendar year, a list of prescription drugs included in reports submitted under sub-
sections (2) and (6) of this section; and
(b) Access to pricing information submitted to the department under subsections (3), (6) and (7)
of this section.
(12) The department shall make available to consumers, online and by telephone, a process for
consumers to notify the department about an increase in the price of a prescription drug. Any per-
sonally identifiable information about a consumer included in a notification provided to the depart-
ment under this subsection, such as a consumer’s name, address, telephone number or electronic
mail address, is confidential and not subject to disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(13) The department may adopt rules as necessary for carrying out the provisions of this section.
(14) No later than December 15 of each year, the department shall compile and report the in-
formation collected by the department under this section to the interim committees of the Legisla-
tive Assembly related to health. The report shall include recommendations for legislative changes,
if any, to contain the cost of prescription drugs and reduce the impact of price increases on con-
sumers, the Department of Corrections, the Public Employees’ Benefit Board, the Oregon Health
Authority, the Department of Human Services, the Oregon Educators Benefit Board and health in-
surance premiums in the commercial market.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 646A.689 by section 1 of this 2026 Act become op-
erative on January 1, 2028.
[4]

A-Eng. SB 1528

[5]